Utah statutes.
63I-4-304.   Government immunity.

(1)  This chapter or the inclusion of an activity on an inventory made under this chapter may not be construed as a waiver of any right, claim, or defense of immunity that an agency may have under Title 63G, Chapter 7, Governmental Immunity Act of Utah, or other law.

(2)  The inclusion in an inventory of an activity as a commercial activity for purposes of this chapter may not be construed to find that the activity does not constitute an exercise of a governmental function.

